Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1358.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6 of the act of July 25, 1961 (P.L.825, No.359), known as the Oil and Gas Conservation Law, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 6. Drilling Permits.--* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526 (c) Notwithstanding subsections (a) and (b) of this section:(1) Before drilling a well which is to penetrate the Onondaga or deeper horizons or a depth of three thousand eight hundred feet, whichever is deeper, and which is intended to produce primarily from the Utica shale formation, the well operator shall obtain a permit.(2) The application for a permit under this subsection shall be processed in accordance with the regulations promulgated under 58 Pa.C.S. Ch. 32 (relating to development).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1358PN1769 - 2 - 12345678910